California statutes. Penal Code
(a) (1) Upon request to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and verification of the identity of the requester, notice of any hearing to review or consider the parole suitability for any inmate in a state prison shall be given by telephone, certified mail, regular mail, or electronic mail, using the method of communication selected by the requesting party, if that method is available, by the Board of Parole Hearings at least 90 days before the hearing to any victim of any crime committed by the inmate, or to the next of kin of the victim if the victim has died, to include the commitment crimes, determinate term commitment crimes for which the inmate has been paroled, and any other felony crimes or crimes against
 the person for which the inmate has been convicted. The requesting party shall keep the board apprised of
 their current contact information in order to receive the notice.

(2) No later than 30 days before the date selected for the hearing, any person entitled to attend the hearing, other than the victim, victim’s next of kin, member of the victim’s family, victim’s representative, counsel representing any of these persons, or victim support persons, shall inform the board of their intention to attend the hearing and the name and identifying information of any other person entitled to attend the hearing who will accompany them.

(3) No later than 14 days before the date selected for the hearing, the board shall notify every person entitled to attend the hearing confirming the date, time, and place of the hearing.

(4) The department and the board may require no more than 15 days’ notice by a victim, victim’s next of kin, member of the victim’s family, victim’s representative, counsel representing any of these persons, or victim support persons, of their intention to attend the hearing.

(b) (1) The victim, next of kin, members of the victim’s family, and two representatives designated as provided in paragraph (2) of this subdivision have the right to appear, personally or by counsel, at the hearing and to adequately and reasonably express their views concerning the inmate and the case, including, but not limited to the commitment crimes, determinate term commitment crimes for which the inmate has been paroled, any other felony crimes or crimes against the person for which the inmate has been convicted, the effect of the
 enumerated crimes on the victim and the family of the victim, the person responsible for these enumerated crimes, and the suitability of the inmate for parole.

(2) Any statement provided by a representative designated by the victim or next of kin may cover any subject about which the victim or next of kin has the right to be heard including any recommendation regarding the granting of parole. The representatives shall be designated by the victim or, in the event that the victim is deceased or incapacitated, by the next of kin. They shall be designated in writing for the particular hearing before the hearing.

(c) A representative designated by the victim or the victim’s next of kin for purposes of this section may be any adult person selected by the victim or the family
 of the victim. The board shall permit a representative designated by the victim or the victim’s next of kin to attend a particular hearing, to provide testimony at a hearing, and to submit a statement to be included in the hearing as provided in Section 3043.2, even though the victim, next of kin, or a member of the victim’s immediate family is present at the hearing, and even though the victim, next of kin, or a member of the victim’s immediate family has submitted a statement as described in Section 3043.2.

(d) The board, in deciding whether to release the person on parole, shall consider the entire and uninterrupted statements of the victim or victims, next of kin, immediate family members of the victim, and the designated representatives of the victim or next of kin, if applicable, made pursuant to this section and shall include in
 its report a statement whether the person would pose a threat to public safety if released on parole.

(e) In those cases where there are more than two immediate family members of the victim who wish to attend any hearing covered in this section, the board shall allow attendance of additional immediate family members to include the following: spouse, children, parents, siblings, grandchildren, and grandparents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 795, Sec. 2.   (AB 88)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Note: This section was added on June 8, 1982, by initiative Prop. 8, and amended on Nov. 4, 2008, by initiative Prop. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

3043.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, a victim, his or her next of kin, or any immediate family member of the victim who appears at any hearing to review or consider the parole suitability of any inmate pursuant to Section 3043 shall be entitled to the attendance of one person of his or her own choosing at the hearing for support. The person so chosen shall not participate in the hearing nor make comments while in attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 470, Sec. 8.   (SB 230)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3043.2.

(a) (1) In lieu of personal appearance at any hearing to review the parole suitability, the Board of Parole Hearings shall permit the victim, his or her next of kin, immediate family members, or two representatives designated for a particular hearing by the victim or next of kin in writing before the hearing to file with the board a written, audiotaped, or videotaped statement, or statement stored on a CD-ROM, DVD, or any other recording medium accepted by a court pursuant to Section 1191.15 or by the board, expressing his or her views concerning the crime and the person responsible. The statement may be personal messages from the person to the board made at any time or may be a statement made pursuant to Section 1191.16, or a combination of both, except that any
 statement provided by a representative designated by the victim or next of kin shall be limited to comments concerning the effect of the crime on the victim.

(2) A representative designated by the victim or the victim’s next of kin for purposes of this section must be either a family or household member of the victim.

(3) The board shall consider any statement filed prior to reaching a decision, and shall include in its report a statement of whether the person would pose a threat to public safety if released on parole.

(b) Whenever an audio or video statement or a statement stored on a CD-ROM, DVD, or other medium is filed with the board, a written transcript of the statement shall also be provided by the person filing the statement.

(c) Nothing in this
 section shall be construed to prohibit the prosecutor from representing to the board the views of the victim, his or her immediate family members, or next of kin.

(d) In the event the board permits an audio or video statement or statement stored on a CD-ROM, DVD, or other medium to be filed, the board shall not be responsible for providing any equipment or resources needed to assist the victim in preparing the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 470, Sec. 9.   (SB 230)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3043.25.

Any victim, next of kin, members of the victim’s immediate family, or representatives designated for a particular hearing by the victim or next of kin in writing before the hearing who have the right to appear at a hearing to review parole suitability, either personally as provided in Section 3043, or by a written, audiotaped, or videotaped statement as provided in Section 3043.2, and any prosecutor who has the right to appear pursuant to Section 3041.7, shall also have the right to appear by means of videoconferencing, if videoconferencing is available at the hearing site. For the purposes of this section, “videoconferencing” means the live transmission of audio and video signals by any means from one physical location to another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 470, Sec. 10.   (SB 230)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3043.3.

As used in Sections 3043, 3043.1, 3043.2, and 3043.25, the term “immediate family” shall include the victim’s spouse, parent, grandparent, brother, sister, and children or grandchildren who are related by blood, marriage, or adoption. As used in Sections 3043 and 3043.2, the term “household member of the victim” means a person who lives, or was living at the time of the crime, in the victim’s household, and who has, or for a deceased victim had at the time of the crime, an intimate or close relationship with the victim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 289, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3043.5.

(a) This section shall be known as the “Condit-Nolan Public Participation in Parole Act of 1984.”

(b) Any person interested in the grant or denial of parole to any prisoner in a state prison shall have the right to submit a statement of views in support of or in opposition to the granting of parole. The board, in deciding whether to release the person on parole, shall review all information received from the public to insure that the gravity and timing of all current or past convicted offenses have been given adequate consideration and to insure that the safety of the
 public has been adequately considered. Upon completion of its review, the board shall include in its report a statement that it has reviewed all information received from the public and its conclusion as to whether the person would pose a threat to the public safety if released on parole.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 805, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3043.6.

Any person authorized to appear at a parole hearing pursuant to Section 3043, or a prosecutor authorized to represent the views of the victim, his or her immediate family, or next of kin, pursuant to Section 3043.2, shall have the right to speak last before the board in regard to those persons appearing and speaking before the board at a parole hearing. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the person presiding at the hearing from taking any steps he or she deems appropriate to ensure that only accurate and relevant statements are considered in determining parole
 suitability as provided in law, including, but not limited to, the rebuttal of inaccurate statements made by any party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 1, Sec. 4.   Effective January 21, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3044.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Parole Hearings or its successor in interest shall be the state’s parole authority and shall be responsible for protecting victims’ rights in the parole process. Accordingly, to protect a victim from harassment and abuse during the parole process, no person paroled from a California correctional facility following incarceration for an offense committed on or after the effective date
 of this act shall, in the event his or her parole is revoked, be entitled to procedural rights other than the following:

(1) A parolee shall be entitled to a probable cause hearing no later than 15 days following his or her arrest for violation of parole.

(2) A parolee shall be entitled to an evidentiary revocation hearing no later than 45 days following his or her arrest for violation of parole.

(3) A parolee shall, upon request, be entitled to counsel at state expense only if, considering the request on a case-by-case basis, the board or its hearing officers determine:

(A) The parolee is indigent; and

(B) Considering the complexity of the charges, the defense, or because the parolee’s
 mental or educational capacity, he or she appears incapable of speaking effectively in his or her own defense.

(4) In the event the parolee’s request for counsel, which shall be considered on a case-by-case basis, is denied, the grounds for denial shall be stated succinctly in the record.

(5) Parole revocation determinations shall be based upon a preponderance of evidence admitted at hearings including documentary evidence, direct testimony, or hearsay evidence offered by parole agents, peace officers, or a victim.

(6) Admission of the recorded or hearsay statement of a victim or percipient witness shall not be construed to create a right to confront the witness at the hearing.

(b) The board is entrusted with the safety of victims and the public and
 shall make its determination fairly, independently, and without bias and shall not be influenced by or weigh the state cost or burden associated with just decisions. The board must accordingly enjoy sufficient autonomy to conduct unbiased hearings, and maintain an independent legal and administrative staff. The board shall report to the Governor.

(History: Added November 4, 2008, by initiative Proposition 9, Sec. 5.3.   Note: Prop. 9 is titled the Victims' Bill of Rights Act of 2008: Marsy's Law.)
-------------------------------------------

3045.

Any sentence based on conviction of crime of which the person was previously pardoned on the express ground that he was not guilty shall not be counted as a previous conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 671.)
-------------------------------------------

3046.

(a) An inmate imprisoned under a life sentence shall not be paroled until he or she has served the greater of the following:

(1) A term of at least seven calendar years.

(2) A term as established pursuant to any other law that establishes a minimum term or minimum period of confinement under a life sentence before eligibility for parole.

(b) If two or more life sentences are ordered to run consecutively to each other pursuant to Section 669, an inmate so imprisoned shall not be paroled until he or she has served the term specified in subdivision (a) on each of the
 life sentences that are ordered to run consecutively.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), an inmate found suitable for parole pursuant to a youth offender parole hearing as described in Section 3051 or an elderly parole hearing as described in Section 3055 shall be paroled regardless of the manner in which the board set release dates pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3041, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 3041 and Sections 3041.1 and 3041.2, as applicable.

(d) The Board of Parole Hearings shall, in considering a parole for an inmate, consider all statements and recommendations which may have been submitted by the judge, district attorney, and sheriff, pursuant to Section 1203.01, or in response to notices given under Section 3042, and recommendations of other
 persons interested in the granting or denying of parole. The board shall enter on its order granting or denying parole to these inmates, the fact that the statements and recommendations have been considered by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (AB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3049.

In all other cases not heretofore provided for, no prisoner sentenced prior to July 1, 1977 may be paroled until he has served the minimum term of imprisonment provided by law for the offense of which he was convicted, except that in cases where the prisoner was serving a sentence on December 31, 1947, and in which the minimum term of imprisonment is more than one year, he may be paroled at any time after the expiration of one-half of the minimum term, with benefit of credits, but in no case shall he be paroled until he has served one calendar year; provided, that any prisoner, received on or after January 1, 1948, at any state prison or institution under the jurisdiction of
 the Director of Corrections, whose minimum term of imprisonment is more than one year, may be paroled at any time after the expiration of one-third of the minimum term. In all other cases he may be paroled at any time after he has served the minimum term prescribed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

3049.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3049, any prisoner selected for inclusion in a specific research program approved by the Board of Corrections may be paroled upon completion of the diagnostic study provided for in Section 5079. The number of prisoners released in any year under this provision shall not exceed 5 percent of the total number of all prisoners released in the preceding year.

This section shall not apply to a prisoner who, while committing the offense for which he has been imprisoned, physically attacked any person by any means. A threat of attack is not a physical attack for the purposes of this section unless such threat was accompanied by an attempt to inflict physical harm upon some person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 125.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any inmate under the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation who is not currently serving and has not served a prior indeterminate sentence or a sentence for a violent felony, a serious felony, or a crime that requires him or her to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290, who has successfully completed an in prison drug
 treatment program, upon release from state prison, shall, whenever possible, be entered into a 150-day residential aftercare drug treatment program sanctioned by the department.

(b) As a condition of parole, if the inmate successfully completes 150 days of residential aftercare treatment, as determined by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the aftercare provider, the parolee shall be discharged from parole supervision at that time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 126.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3051.

(a) (1) A youth offender parole hearing is a hearing by the Board of Parole Hearings for the purpose of reviewing the parole suitability of any prisoner who was 25 years of age or younger, or was under 18 years of age as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), at the time of the controlling offense.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Incarceration” means detention in a city or county jail, a local juvenile facility, a mental
 health facility, a Division of Juvenile Justice facility, or a Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation facility.

(B) “Controlling offense” means the offense or enhancement for which any sentencing court imposed the longest term of imprisonment.

(C) “Youth parole eligible date” is the earliest date upon which a youth offender is eligible for release on parole at a youth offender parole hearing. Except as provided in subdivision (i) and Section 3051.1, youth offenders are entitled to their initial youth offender parole hearing within six months of their youth parole eligible date, as determined in subdivision (b), unless previously released or entitled to an earlier parole consideration hearing pursuant to any other law.

(b) (1) A person who was convicted of a controlling offense that was committed when the person was 25 years of age or younger and for which the sentence is a determinate sentence shall be eligible for release on parole at a youth offender parole hearing during the person’s 15th year of incarceration. The youth parole eligible date for a person eligible for a youth offender parole hearing under this paragraph shall be the first day of the person’s 15th year of incarceration.

(2) A person who was convicted of a controlling offense that was committed when the person was 25 years of age or younger and
 for which the sentence is a life term of less than 25 years to life shall be eligible for release on parole
 at a youth offender parole hearing during the person’s 20th year of incarceration. The youth parole eligible date for a person eligible for a youth offender parole hearing under this paragraph shall be the first day of the person’s 20th year of incarceration.

(3) A person who was convicted of a controlling offense that was committed when the person was 25 years of age or younger and for which the sentence is a life term of 25 years to life shall be eligible for release on parole at a youth offender parole hearing during the
 person’s 25th year of incarceration. The youth parole eligible date for a person eligible for a youth offender parole hearing under this paragraph shall be the first day of the person’s 25th year of incarceration.

(4) A person who was convicted of a controlling offense that was committed before the person had attained 18 years of age and for which the sentence is life without the possibility of parole shall be eligible for release on parole at a youth offender parole hearing during the person’s 25th year of incarceration. The youth parole
 eligible date for a person eligible for a youth offender parole hearing under this paragraph shall be the first day of the person’s 25th year of incarceration.

(c) An individual subject to this section shall meet with the board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3041.

(d) The board shall conduct a youth offender parole hearing to consider release. At the youth offender parole hearing, the board shall release the individual on parole as provided in Section 3041, except that the board shall act in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 4801.

(e) The youth offender parole hearing to consider release shall provide for a meaningful opportunity to obtain release. The board shall review and, as necessary, revise existing regulations and adopt new regulations regarding determinations of
 suitability made pursuant to this section, subdivision (c) of Section 4801, and other related topics, consistent with relevant case law, in order to provide that meaningful opportunity for release.

(f) (1) In assessing growth and maturity, psychological evaluations and risk assessment instruments, if used by the board, shall be administered by licensed psychologists employed by the board and shall take into consideration the diminished culpability of youth as compared to that of adults, the hallmark features of youth, and any subsequent growth and increased maturity of the individual.

(2) Family members, friends, school personnel, faith leaders, and representatives from community-based organizations with knowledge about the individual before the crime or
 the individual’s growth and maturity since the time of the crime may submit statements for review by the board.

(3) This section is not intended to alter the rights of victims at parole hearings.

(g) If parole is not granted, the board shall set the time for a subsequent youth offender parole hearing in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 3041.5. In exercising its discretion pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) and subdivision (d) of Section 3041.5, the board shall consider the factors in subdivision (c) of Section 4801. A subsequent youth offender parole hearing shall not be necessary if the offender is released pursuant to any other
 law
 prior to the date of the subsequent hearing.

(h) This section shall not apply to cases in which sentencing occurs pursuant to Section 1170.12, subdivisions (b) to (i), inclusive, of Section 667, or Section 667.61, or to cases in which an individual is sentenced to life in prison without the possibility of parole for a controlling offense that was committed after the person had attained 18 years of age. This section shall not apply to an individual to whom this section would otherwise apply, but who, subsequent to attaining 26 years of age, commits an additional crime for which malice aforethought is a necessary element of the crime or for which the individual is sentenced to life in prison.

(i) (1) The board shall complete all youth offender parole hearings for individuals who became entitled to have their parole suitability considered at a
 youth offender parole hearing prior to January 1, 2014, by July 1, 2015.

(2) (A) The board shall complete all youth offender parole hearings for individuals who were sentenced to indeterminate life terms and who become entitled to have their parole suitability considered at a youth offender parole hearing on January 1, 2016, by July 1, 2017.

(B) The board shall complete all
 youth offender parole hearings for individuals who were sentenced to determinate terms and who become entitled to have their parole suitability considered at a youth offender parole hearing on
 January 1, 2016, by July 1, 2021. The board shall, for all individuals described in this subparagraph, conduct the consultation described in subdivision (a) of Section 3041 before July 1, 2017.

(3) (A) The board shall complete all youth offender parole hearings for individuals who were sentenced to indeterminate life terms and who become entitled to have their parole suitability considered at a youth offender parole hearing on January 1, 2018, by January 1, 2020.

(B) The board shall complete all youth offender parole hearings for individuals who were sentenced to
 determinate terms and who become entitled to have their parole suitability considered at a youth offender parole hearing on January 1, 2018, by January 1, 2022. The board shall, for all individuals described in this subparagraph, conduct the consultation described in subdivision (a) of Section 3041 before January 1, 2019.

(4) The board shall complete, by July 1, 2020, all youth offender parole hearings for individuals who were sentenced to terms of life without the possibility of parole and who are or will be entitled to have their parole suitability considered at a youth offender parole hearing before July 1, 2020.

(j) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may authorize persons described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (b) to obtain an earlier youth parole eligible date by adopting regulations pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 32 of Article 1 of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.   (AB 965)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3051.1.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 3051, the board shall complete all youth offender parole hearings for individuals who were sentenced to indeterminate life terms and who become entitled to have their parole suitability considered at a youth offender parole hearing on the effective date of the act that added subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 3051 by January 1, 2018.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 3051, the board shall complete all youth offender parole hearings for individuals who were sentenced to determinate terms and who become entitled to have their parole suitability considered at a youth offender parole hearing on the effective date of the act that added subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 3051 by December 31, 2021. The board shall, for all individuals described in this subdivision, conduct the consultation described in subdivision (a) of Section 3041 before January 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   (SB 519)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3052.

The Board of Parole Hearings shall have the power to establish and enforce rules and regulations under which inmates committed to state prisons may be allowed to go upon parole outside the prison buildings and enclosures when eligible for parole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 470, Sec. 12.   (SB 230)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.

(a) The Board of Parole Hearings upon granting any parole to any prisoner may also impose on the parole any conditions that it may deem proper.

(b) The Board of Parole Hearings may impose as a condition of parole that any prisoner granted parole undergo an examination or test for tuberculosis when the board reasonably
 suspects that the parolee has, has had, or has been exposed to, tuberculosis in an infectious stage.

(c) For purposes of this section, an “examination or test for tuberculosis” means testing and followup examinations or treatment according to the Centers for Disease Control and American Thoracic Society recommendations in effect at the time of the initial examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 13.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.2.

(a) Upon the request of the victim, or the victim’s parent or legal guardian if the victim is a minor, the Board of Parole Hearings or the supervising parole agency shall impose the following condition on the parole of a person released from prison for an offense involving threatening, stalking, sexually abusing, harassing, or violent acts in which the victim is a person specified in Section 6211 of the
 Family Code:

Compliance with a protective order enjoining the parolee from threatening, stalking, sexually abusing, harassing, or taking further violent acts against the victim and, if appropriate, compliance with any or all of the following:

(1) An order prohibiting the parolee from having personal, telephonic, electronic, media, or written contact with the victim.

(2) An order prohibiting the parolee from coming within at least 100 yards of the victim or the victim’s residence or workplace.

(3) An order excluding the parolee from the victim’s residence.

(b) The Board of Parole Hearings or the supervising parole agency may impose the following condition on the parole of a person released from prison for an
 offense involving threatening, stalking, sexually abusing, harassing, or violent acts in which the victim is a person specified in Section 6211 of the Family Code:

For persons who committed the offense prior to January 1, 1997, participation in a batterer’s program, as specified in this section, for the entire period of parole. For persons who committed the offense after January 1, 1997, successful completion of a batterer’s program, which shall be a condition of release from parole. If no batterer’s program is available, another appropriate counseling program designated by the parole agent or officer, for a period of not less than one year, with weekly sessions of a minimum of two hours of classroom time. The program director shall give periodic progress reports to the parole agent or officer at least every three months.

(c) The parole agent or officer shall refer the parolee only to a batterer’s
 program that follows the standards outlined in Section 1203.097 and immediately following sections.

(d) The parolee shall file proof of enrollment in a batterer’s program with the parole agent or officer within 30 days after the first meeting with his or her parole agent or officer, if he or she committed the offense after January 1, 1997, or within 30 days of receiving notice of this parole condition, if he or she committed the offense prior to January 1, 1997.

(e) The parole agent or officer shall conduct an initial assessment of the parolee, which information shall be provided to the batterer’s program. The assessment shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Social, economic, and family background.

(2) Education.

(3) Vocational achievements.

(4) Criminal history, prior incidents of violence, and arrest reports.

(5) Medical history.

(6) Substance abuse history.

(7) Consultation with the probation officer.

(8) Verbal consultation with the victim, only if the victim desires to participate.

(f) Upon request of the victim, the victim shall be notified of the release of the parolee and the parolee’s location and parole agent or officer. If the victim requests notification, he or she shall also be informed that attendance in any program does not guarantee that an abuser will not
 be violent.

(g) The parole agent or officer shall advise the parolee that the failure to enroll in a specified program, as directed, may be considered a parole violation that would result in possible further incarceration.

(h) The director of the batterer’s program shall immediately report any violation of the terms of the protective order issued pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), including any new acts of violence or failure to comply with the program requirements, to the parolee’s parole agent or officer.

(i) Upon recommendation of the director of the batterer’s program, a parole agent or officer may require a parolee to participate in additional sessions throughout the parole period, unless he or she finds that it is not in the interests of justice to do so. In deciding whether the parolee would benefit
 from more sessions, the parole agent or officer shall consider whether any of the following conditions exist:

(1) The parolee has been violence-free for a minimum of six months.

(2) The parolee has cooperated and participated in the batterer’s program.

(3) The parolee demonstrates an understanding of, and practices, positive conflict resolution skills.

(4) The parolee blames, degrades, or has committed acts that dehumanize the victim or puts the victim’s safety at risk, including, but not limited to, molesting, stalking, striking, attacking, threatening, sexually assaulting, or battering the victim.

(5) The parolee demonstrates an understanding that the use of coercion or violent behavior
 to maintain dominance is unacceptable in an intimate relationship.

(6) The parolee has made threats to harm another person in any manner.

(7) The parolee demonstrates acceptance of responsibility for the abusive behavior perpetrated against the victim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 41.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.4.

In the case of any person who is released from prison on parole or after serving a term of imprisonment for any felony offense committed against the person or property of another individual, private institution, or public agency because of the victim’s actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, religion, nationality, country of origin, ancestry, disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation,
 including, but not limited to, offenses defined in Section 422.6, 422.7, 422.75, 594.3, or 11411, the Board of Parole Hearings or the supervising parole agency, absent compelling circumstances, shall order the defendant as a condition of parole to refrain from further acts of violence, threats, stalking, or harassment of the victim, or known immediate family or domestic partner of the victim, including stay-away conditions when appropriate. In these cases, the parole authority may also order that the defendant be required as a condition of parole to complete a class or program on racial or ethnic sensitivity, or other similar training in the area of civil rights, or a one-year counseling program intended to reduce the tendency toward violent and antisocial behavior if that class, program, or training is available and was developed or authorized by the court or local agencies in cooperation with organizations serving the affected community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 42.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.5.

Upon granting parole to any prisoner convicted of any of the offenses enumerated in Section 290, the Board of Parole Hearings shall inquire into the question whether the defendant at the time the offense was committed was intoxicated or addicted to the excessive use of alcoholic liquor or beverages at that time or immediately prior thereto, and if it is found that the person was so intoxicated or so addicted, it shall impose as a condition of parole that such prisoner shall totally abstain from the use of alcoholic liquor or beverages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 14.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.6.

(a) Where a person committed to prison for a sex crime for which registration is required pursuant to Section 290 is to be released on parole, the department, in an appropriate case, shall make an order that the parolee not contact or communicate with the victim of the crime, or any of the victim’s family members. In determining whether to make the order, the department shall consider the facts of the offense and the background of the parolee.

(b) Where a victim, or an immediate
 family member of a victim, requests that the parolee not contact him or her, the order shall be made. An immediate family member’s request that the parolee not contact that person shall be granted even where the direct victim allows contact.

(c) Where the victim is a minor, the order that the parolee shall not contact or communicate with the victim shall be made where requested by the victim, or the parents or guardian of the victim. In the event of a dispute between the parents or guardians of a minor victim concerning whether a no-contact and no-communication order should be made, the board shall hold a hearing to resolve the dispute. The victim, or the parents or guardians, shall not be required to attend the hearing. The victim, or the parents of the victim, may submit a written statement to the board concerning the issue of whether a no-contact or no-communication order shall be made.

(d) The district attorney of the county that prosecuted the defendant for the sex crime for which the parolee was committed to prison may be available to facilitate and assist the victim, or victim’s family member, in stating to the department whether or not the order that the parolee not contact or communicate with him or her shall be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 735, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, when a person is released on parole after having served a term of imprisonment for any of the offenses specified in subdivision (b) in which one or more of the victims was under 14 years of age, and for which registration is required pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act, it shall be a condition of parole that the person may not, during the period of parole, enter a park where children regularly gather without the express permission of the person’s parole agent.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to persons released on parole after having served a term of imprisonment for an offense specified in Section 261, 264.1, 269, 286, 287, 288.5, 288.7, or 289, paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 288, subdivision (c) of Section
 667.51, subdivision (j), (k), or (l) of Section 667.61, Section 667.71, or former Section 262 or 288a.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 60.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.9.

If an inmate has a prior conviction for a sexually violent offense, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the board shall consider the results of a comprehensive risk assessment for sex
 offenders in considering parole.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (SB 141)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3054.
